Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 1 Units Designed to Be Affixed to Foundations or Existing Buildings

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1 rewrote this part. Section 2 of the 1982 Act provided that the Act was to become effective upon approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without his approval. The Act was signed on, and thus became effective on, April 16, 1982, although the Code itself did not become effective until November 1, 1982, as provided in Code Section 1-1-9.

8-2-110.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that, in an effort to meet the building needs within the state, the private construction industry has developed mass production techniques which can substantially reduce construction costs and that the mass production of buildings presents unique problems with respect to the establishment of uniform health and safety standards and inspection procedures. The General Assembly further finds that, by minimizing the problems of standards and inspection procedures, it is demonstrating its intention to encourage the reduction of building construction costs and to make building and home ownership more feasible for all residents of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-2-110

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “residents of this state” for “residents of the state” at the end of the last sentence of this Code section.

8-2-111.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community affairs.

“Component” means any assembly, subassembly, or combination of parts for use as a part of a building, which may include structural, electrical, plumbing, mechanical, and fire protection systems and other systems affecting health and safety.

“Industrialized building” means any structure or component thereof which is designed and constructed in compliance with the state minimum standards codes and is wholly or in substantial part made, fabricated, formed, or assembled in manufacturing facilities for installation or assembly and installation on a building site and has been manufactured in such a manner that all parts or processes cannot be inspected at the installation site without disassembly, damage to, or destruction thereof.

“Installation” means the assembly of an industrialized building on site and the process of affixing the industrialized building, component, or system to land, a foundation, footings, or an existing building.

“Local government” means a county or municipality of this state.

“Manufacture” means the process of making, fabricating, constructing, forming, or assembling a product from raw, unfinished, or semifinished materials.

(6.1)

“Residential industrialized building” means any dwelling unit designed and constructed in compliance with the Georgia State Minimum Standard One and Two Family Dwelling Code which is wholly or in substantial part made, fabricated, formed, or assembled in a manufacturing facility and cannot be inspected at the installation site without disassembly, damage to, or destruction thereof. Any such structure may or may not contain a permanent metal chassis but shall be affixed to a permanent load-bearing foundation. The term shall not include manufactured homes as defined by the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

“Site” means the entire tract, subdivision, or parcel of land on which the industrialized building is installed.

“System” means structural, plumbing, mechanical, electrical, or fire safety elements, materials, or components used separately or combined for use in a building.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 13; Code 1981, §

8-2-111

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1158, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 319, §§ 1, 2/HB 516; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 8/HB 142; Ga. L. 2020, p. 602, § 1/HB 1008.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the second sentence of paragraph (6.1), substituted “may or may not contain” for “shall not contain” and substituted “but shall” for “and shall”.

8-2-112.
Inspection and approval of industrialized buildings by commissioner or local government; modifications prohibited; costs; adoption of rules.

An industrialized building manufactured after the effective date of the rules adopted pursuant to Code Section 8-2-113 which is sold, offered for sale, or installed within this state must bear the insignia of approval issued by the commissioner.

This Code section shall not apply to industrialized buildings which are inspected and approved by a local government which has jurisdiction at the site of installation and which are inspected at the place of and during the time of manufacture in accordance with standards established by the commissioner. The cost of the inspection shall be borne by the manufacturer. The commissioner shall be notified of the installation of all such buildings in a manner as the commissioner shall prescribe by rule.

All industrialized buildings and residential industrialized buildings bearing an insignia of approval issued by the commissioner pursuant to this part shall be deemed to comply with the state minimum standards codes and all ordinances and regulations enacted by any local government which are applicable to the manufacture or installation of such buildings. The determination by the commissioner of the scope of such approval is final. No ordinance or regulation enacted by a county or municipality shall exclude residential industrialized buildings from being sited in such county or municipality in a residential district solely because the building is a residential industrialized building.

Areas of county and municipal authority including, but not limited to, local land use and zoning, building setback, side and rear yard requirements, utility connections, and subdivision regulation, as well as the regulation of architectural and esthetic requirements, are specifically and entirely reserved to the county, if in the unincorporated area, or the municipality where the industrialized building or residential industrialized building is sited.

No industrialized building or component bearing an insignia of approval issued by the commissioner pursuant to this part shall be in any way modified prior to or during installation unless approval is first obtained from the commissioner.

Industrialized buildings which have been inspected and approved by a local government agency shall not be modified prior to or during installation unless approval for the modification is first obtained from the local government agency.

The commissioner by rule shall establish a schedule of fees to pay the costs incurred for the work related to administration and enforcement of this Code section.

All rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner under this part shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 13; Code 1981, §

8-2-112

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 8; Ga. L. 2010, p. 319, § 3/HB 516.

8-2-113.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by commissioner; delegation of inspection authority; rules and regulations continued in full force and effect; advisory committee; powers of commissioner; training programs.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to interpret and make specific the provisions of this part. These rules and regulations shall include provisions imposing requirements reasonably consistent with recognized, nationally accepted standards. The commissioner shall adopt other rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this part.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this part and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant hereto, except that inspection authority may be delegated to a local government agency, an approved inspection agency, or an agency of another state in such manner as the commissioner shall determine.

The rules promulgated by the State Building Administrative Board pursuant to an Act providing for certification of factory built housing and for the establishment of uniform health and safety standards and inspection procedures for factory built housing, approved April 1, 1971 (Ga. L. 1971, p. 364), as amended, shall continue in full force and effect until the effective date of rules adopted pursuant to this part. Units approved under the provisions of the State Building Administrative Board’s rules shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of rules promulgated pursuant to this part.

The commissioner shall consult with and obtain the advice of an advisory committee on industrialized buildings in the drafting, promulgation, and revision of rules and regulations to be adopted for the purpose of this part. The committee shall consist of 11 members appointed by the commissioner and approved by the Governor to serve at the commissioner’s pleasure. Members shall be appointed for four-year terms, and no member of the committee shall be appointed to serve more than two full terms. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment by the commissioner for the remainder of the unexpired term, and such successor shall meet the requirements and criteria of selection of the person previously holding the vacant position. To be eligible to serve on the committee, each individual member shall be and remain actively involved in the profession or industry of his or her appointed committee position. The position of any member of the committee who, during his or her term of appointment, shall cease to meet the qualifications for original appointment shall be deemed to be vacated. Members of said committee shall consist of technically qualified, interested, and affected persons appointed by the commissioner from the following professional, technical, and occupational fields:

Two members shall be licensed design professionals representing two of the following: structural engineering, electrical engineering, architecture, or mechanical engineering;

One member shall be a building code enforcement officer;

One member shall be from the residential industrialized building industry;

One member shall be from the commercial industrialized building industry;

One member shall be from the industrialized building installation industry;

One member shall be an elected member of the governing body of a municipality;

One member shall be an elected member of the governing body of a county;

One member shall be from the industrialized building evaluation-inspection service;

One member shall be from a regional commission; and

One member shall be the Commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs or his or her designee.

The advisory committee shall meet on call by the commissioner, and the members of the advisory committee shall be reimbursed for any reasonable and necessary travel and other expenses actually incurred by them while attending meetings of said committee.

Recommendations from this committee shall be subject to approval by an advisory committee appointed by the commissioner pursuant to Code Section 8-2-24.

The commissioner may set qualifications and employ and fix the compensation of any state inspectors or other employees necessary to carry out the provisions of this part. The commissioner may authorize such state inspectors to travel inside or outside the state for the purpose of inspecting industrialized buildings and manufacturing facilities to determine compliance of such structures with standards promulgated pursuant to this part. Upon the request of a local government, the commissioner may authorize a state inspector to visit any site of installation of industrialized buildings for the purpose of inspecting such installation on behalf of the local government requesting such service. The cost of any inspections made pursuant to this subsection shall be borne by the manufacturer in such manner as the commissioner may prescribe by rule.

The commissioner may establish necessary training programs for a local government enforcement agency and inspection agency personnel.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 13; Code 1981, §

8-2-113

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 8; Ga. L. 2007, p. 275, § 1/SB 246; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 12/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 8/SB 455.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a hyphen was deleted twice between “factory” and “built” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

The State Building Administrative Board, referred to in subsection (c), was created by Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, § 2. That Act was repealed by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 14. All functions previously exercised by the State Building Administrative Board with regard to factory built housing were transferred to the commissioner of community affairs by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 13.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administration, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-1.

Definitions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-2.

Adoption of Codes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-3.

Local authority, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-4.

Agency requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-5.

Agency responsibilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-6.

Manufacturer requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-7.

Building system, model plan, and installation requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-8.

Quality control requirements for manufacturing facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-9.

State insignia and data plate requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-10.

Certification of existing industrialized building requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-11.

Schedule of fees, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-13.

Appeals, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Industrialized Buildings, Chapter 110-2-14.

8-2-114.
Approval by commissioner of industrialized building meeting standards prescribed by other states; delegation of inspection authority.

If the commissioner determines that the standards for construction and inspection of industrialized buildings prescribed by statute or rule of another state are reasonably consistent with the standards developed by the commissioner under this part and that such standards are actually enforced by such other state, the commissioner may provide by rule that industrialized buildings approved by such other state are approved by the commissioner.

The commissioner may assign inspection authority contained in this part by contract with political subdivisions of the State of Georgia, private persons, corporations, and associations.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 5; Code 1981, §

8-2-114

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1.

8-2-115.
Appeals from applications of rules and regulations.

Any person aggrieved by the application of any rule or regulation to such person, which rule or regulation is promulgated pursuant to this part, may appeal such application of such rule or regulation. Any such appeal shall be made to an appeals committee appointed by the commissioner which shall consist of not less than three nor more than five members.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to the hearing of appeals consistent with the provisions of this Code section.

A final decision of an appeals committee of the commissioner may be appealed in the same manner specified in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” to the same courts with the same rights and limitations specified in such chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 6; Code 1981, §

8-2-115

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 6.

8-2-116.
Injunctive relief.

The commissioner may obtain injunctive relief from the superior court to enjoin the sale, delivery, or installation or to require the inspection, repair, or removal of an industrialized building upon an affidavit specifying the manner in which the industrial building does not conform to the requirements of this part or to rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part.
In order to avail himself of the remedies provided for in this Code section, it shall not be necessary for the commissioner to allege or to prove the absence of an adequate remedy at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 7; Code 1981, §

8-2-116

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1158, § 2.

8-2-117.
Civil cause of action against manufacturers, installers, or dealers of industrialized buildings; damages, costs, and attorney’s fees.

Notwithstanding any other remedy at law, a person who suffers an injury to his person or property or to his person and property as a result of a violation of this part or rules and regulations adopted pursuant hereto shall have a cause of action against the manufacturer, installer, or dealer, or any combination thereof, of the industrialized building causing such injury.
Any award may include damages and the cost of litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 8; Code 1981, §

8-2-117

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1158, § 3.

8-2-117.1.
Cease and desist orders and penalties for violations of part; appeals.

Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that any person is or has been violating provisions of this part, the commissioner may issue and deliver to such person an order to cease and desist such violation.
In addition, the commissioner may impose a penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each day the violation exists.
A separate violation shall be deemed to have occurred with respect to each industrialized building or component involved. Decisions made pursuant to this Code section may be appealed as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-117.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1158, § 4.

8-2-118.
Penalty; separate violations.

A person who violates any of the provisions of this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. A separate violation shall be deemed to have occurred with respect to each industrialized building or component involved.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 9; Code 1981, §

8-2-118

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 8.

8-2-119.
Applicability of part.

The provisions of this part shall not apply to Part 2 of this article relating to manufactured homes.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 364, § 10; Code 1981, §

8-2-119

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 6.

8-2-120.
Authority to enter to determine compliance with part.

The commissioner or the authorized representatives of the commissioner may enter at reasonable times any factory, warehouse, site, or establishment in which industrialized buildings are manufactured, stored, held for sale, or installed for the purpose of ascertaining whether the requirements of this part and the rules and regulations issued pursuant to this part have been and are being met.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-120

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1158, § 5.

8-2-121.
Records and reports to be maintained by manufacturers, dealers, and installers; inspection of books, papers, records, and documents.

Each manufacturer, dealer, or installer of industrialized buildings shall establish and maintain such records, make such reports, and provide such information as the commissioner may require by rule or regulation in order to determine whether the manufacturer, dealer, or installer has acted or is acting in compliance with this part.
The commissioner may inspect the appropriate books, papers, records, and documents relevant to determining whether the manufacturer, dealer, or installer has acted or is acting in compliance with this part.
This authority shall be liberally construed.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-121

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1158, § 5.